Indiana, session 2026, HB1294.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-56.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 56.5. Administrative Rules Review Committee
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" means any officer,
board, commission, department, division, bureau, committee, or
other governmental entity exercising any of the executive
(including the administrative) powers of state government. The
term does not include the legislative or judicial department of state
government or a political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "committee" refers to the
administrative rules review committee established by section 4 of
this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "rule" means the whole or any
part of a statement of general applicability, including an executive
order, that:
(1) has or is designed to have the effect of law; and
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


(2) implements, interprets, or prescribes:
(A) law or policy; or
(B) the organization, procedure, or practice requirements
of an agency.
The term includes a fee, a fine, a civil penalty, a financial benefit
limitation, or another payment amount set by an agency that
otherwise qualifies as a rule.
Sec. 4. (a) The administrative rules review committee is
established to serve the general assembly as a continuing
committee. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the
committee shall operate under the rules of the legislative council.
(b) The committee consists of the following twelve (12) members
of the general assembly, including the chair and vice chair:
(1) Four (4) members appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate.
(2) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader of the
senate.
(3) Four (4) members appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives.
(4) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives.
(c) The president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint the
chair of the committee beginning July 1 of odd-numbered years
and the vice chair of the committee beginning July 1 of
even-numbered years. The speaker of the house of representatives
shall appoint the vice chair of the committee beginning July 1 in
odd-numbered years and the chair of the committee beginning July
1 in even-numbered years.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the term of a
member of the committee ends on June 30 of the next
odd-numbered year following the member's appointment.
However, the member may be reappointed to subsequent terms.
(e) A member of the committee may be removed at any time by
the appointing authority who appointed the member.
(f) If a vacancy exists on the committee, the appointing
authority who appointed the member whose position has become
vacant shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy. An individual
appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the remainder of the term of
the vacating member.
(g) If a member of the committee ceases to:
(1) be a member of the chamber from which the member was
appointed; or
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


(2) hold the member's office;
the member ceases to be a member of the committee.
(h) Each member of the committee is entitled to receive the
same per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to individuals
who serve as legislative and lay members, respectively, of interim
study committees established by the legislative council.
(i) The committee shall meet at the call of the chair. The
committee may meet during the sessions of the general assembly
and during the interim periods between sessions (as defined in
IC 2-5-1.3-1).
(j) Seven (7) members of the committee constitute a quorum.
(k) The affirmative vote of a majority of the members appointed
to the committee is required for the committee to take action on
any measure.
(l) The committee shall review rules submitted to the committee
under IC 4-22-2-34.5.
(m) All meetings of the committee are open to the public in
accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the
committee are subject to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
(n) The legislative services agency shall staff the committee.
(o) All funds necessary to carry out this chapter shall be paid
from appropriations to the legislative council and the legislative
services agency.
SECTION 2. IC 4-22-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) Subject to subsections (b), (c), and (d), this
chapter applies to the addition, amendment, or repeal of a rule in every
rulemaking action.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the following agencies:
(1) Any military officer or board.
(2) Any state educational institution.
(c) This chapter does not apply to a rulemaking action that results
in any of the following rules:
(1) A resolution or directive of any agency that relates solely to
internal policy, internal agency organization, or internal procedure
and does not have the effect of law.
(2) A restriction or traffic control determination of a purely local
nature that:
(A) is ordered by the commissioner of the Indiana department
of transportation;
(B) is adopted under IC 9-20-1-3(d), IC 9-21-4-7, or
IC 9-20-7; and
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


(C) applies only to one (1) or more particularly described
intersections, highway portions, bridge causeways, or viaduct
areas.
(3) A rule adopted by the secretary of state under IC 26-1-9.1-526.
(4) Except as provided in sections 34.5 and 35 of this chapter,
an executive order or proclamation issued by the governor.
(5) A rule adopted by the board of trustees of the Indiana public
retirement system, as provided in IC 5-10.5-4-2. However, the
board shall submit rules adopted by the board to the publisher for
publication in the Indiana Register.
(d) Except as specifically set forth in IC 13-14-9:
(1) IC 13-14-9 provides supplemental procedures for notice and
public comment concerning proposed rules for the boards listed
in IC 13-14-9-1; and
(2) the department of environmental management and the boards
listed in IC 13-14-9-1 shall comply with the procedures in
IC 13-14-9 in lieu of complying with sections 26, 27, and 29
(except section 29(c)) of this chapter.
In adopting rules, all other provisions of IC 4-22-2 apply to these
agencies.
SECTION 3. IC 4-22-2-34, AS AMENDED BY P.L.123-2006,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 34. (a) The governor may approve or disapprove
a rule submitted under section 33 of this chapter with or without cause.
(b) The governor has fifteen (15) days from the date that an agency
submits a rule under section 33 of this chapter to approve or disapprove
the rule. However, the governor may take thirty (30) days to approve
or disapprove the rule if the governor files a statement with the
publisher within the first fifteen (15) days after an agency submits the
rule that states that the governor intends to take an additional fifteen
(15) days to approve or disapprove the rule.
(c) If the governor neither approves nor disapproves the rule within
the allowed period, the rule is deemed approved, and the agency may
submit the rule to the publisher under subsection (d) without the
approval of the governor.
(d) After:
(1) a rule has been approved or deemed approved under this
section; and
(2) the regulatory analysis required under sections 22.7 and
22.8 of this chapter has been completed, if applicable;
the agency shall submit the rule to the legislative council under
section 34.5 of this chapter.
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


SECTION 4. IC 4-22-2-34.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 34.5. (a) This section applies to a rule:
(1) subject to sections 23 through 36 of this chapter and if the
agency commences the rulemaking action after June 30, 2026,
under section 23 of this chapter; or
(2) that is an executive order.
(b) After a rule has been approved or deemed approved under
section 34 of this chapter, or, if the rule is an executive order,
issued by the governor, and after the regulatory analysis required
by sections 22.7 and 22.8 has been completed, if applicable, the
agency shall submit the rule to the legislative council, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6. The office of fiscal management
and analysis of the legislative services agency shall conduct a fiscal
analysis of the rule. The agency shall submit the following for
review by the office of fiscal management and analysis, if
applicable:
(1) The rule in the form required by section 20 of this chapter,
or the executive order.
(2) The latest version of the regulatory analysis submitted to
the budget agency and the office of management and budget
under section 22.8 of this chapter.
(3) Any data, studies, or analyses relied on by the agency to
develop the regulatory analysis in the manner specified in
section 17.5 of this chapter.
(4) Any proposals submitted under IC 13-14-8-2 or
IC 13-14-8-5 that are applicable to the rule.
(5) Any other:
(A) documents or information requested by the legislative
council;
(B) documents or information required to be submitted to
the attorney general or governor with a rule for approval
under sections 31 through 34 of this chapter; and
(C) documents or information demonstrating approval by
the attorney general and governor under sections 31
through 34 of this chapter.
(c) If, after completing the fiscal analysis described in subsection
(b), the office of fiscal management and analysis estimates the fiscal
impact on state and local government to be greater than three
hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in any two (2) year period,
the office of fiscal management and analysis shall provide the fiscal
analysis, the rule, and the supporting documents under this section
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


to the administrative rules review committee for review. Except as
provided in subsection (e), a rule subject to review under this
subsection may not take effect unless authorized by a bill enacted
by the general assembly.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), a rule subject to review
under subsection (c):
(1) must be authorized by a bill enacted by the general
assembly before the publisher may accept the rule for filing
under section 35 of this chapter, if the rule is not an executive
order; or
(2) is void unless authorized by a bill enacted by the general
assembly, if the rule is an executive order.
(e) If the governor certifies that an emergency exists and that
the rule is necessary to address the emergency, the rule takes effect
immediately (or as specified in the rule) and expires one (1) year
after the date of the governor's certification. A rule that has
expired and is sought to be renewed or revived, or a substantially
similar rule, may not go into effect unless authorized by a bill
enacted by the general assembly.
(f) At any time before the conclusion of the rulemaking process,
an agency, or the governor, if the rule is an executive order, may
obtain a preliminary fiscal analysis of a proposed rule by
submitting the proposed rule to the legislative council in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6. The office of fiscal management
and analysis of the legislative services agency shall conduct a
preliminary fiscal analysis of the proposed rule. The agency shall
submit to the office of fiscal management and analysis the material
described in subsection (b)(1) through (b)(5).
SECTION 5. IC 4-22-2-35, AS AMENDED BY P.L.123-2006,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 35. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d) and
subject to section 34.5 of this chapter, when a rule has been approved
or deemed approved by the governor within the period allowed by
section 25 of this chapter, the agency shall immediately submit the rule
to the publisher for filing. The agency shall submit the rule in the form
required by section 20 of this chapter and with the documents required
by section 21 of this chapter.
(b) The agency shall submit to the publisher the copies of the rule
and other documents specified in section 31 of this chapter.
(c) Subject to section 39 of this chapter, the publisher shall:
(1) accept the rule for filing; and
(2) electronically record the date and time the rule is accepted.
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


(d) Except as provided in section 34.5(e) of this chapter, a rule
required to be provided to the administrative rules review
committee for review under section 34.5(c) of this chapter may not
be submitted to the publisher until the rule has been authorized by
a bill enacted by the general assembly.
SECTION 6. IC 4-22-2-40, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40. (a) At any time before a rule is accepted for
filing by the publisher under section 35, 37.1, 37.2, or 38 of this
chapter, the agency that adopted the rule may recall it. A rule may be
recalled regardless of whether:
(1) the rule has been disapproved by the attorney general under
section 32 of this chapter; or
(2) the rule has been disapproved by the governor under section
34 of this chapter; or
(3) the rule has been reviewed by the administrative rules
review committee under section 34.5 of this chapter.
(b) IC 13-14-9 and sections 23 through 38 of this chapter do not
apply to a recall action under this section. However, the agency shall
distribute a notice of its recall action to the publisher for publication in
the Indiana Register. IC 13-14-9 and sections 23 and 26 of this chapter
do not apply to a readoption action under subsection (c).
(c) After an agency recalls a rule, the agency may reconsider its
adoption action and adopt an identical rule or a revised rule. However,
if IC 13-14-9 or sections 23 through 36 of this chapter apply to the
recalled rule, the readopted rule must comply with the requirements
under section 29 of this chapter or IC 13-14-9-9 (as applicable).
(d) The recall of a rule under this section voids any approval given
after the rule was adopted and before the rule was recalled.
(e) If a rule is:
(1) subject to sections 31, and 33, and 34.5 of this chapter;
(2) recalled under subsection (a); and
(3) readopted under subsection (c);
the agency shall resubmit the readopted version of the recalled rule to
the attorney general and the governor for approval, and to the
administrative rules review committee. The attorney general and the
governor have the full statutory period to approve or disapprove the
readopted rule. The agency shall resubmit the readopted version of a
recalled rule to the office of management and budget with sufficient
information for the office of management and budget to evaluate
whether the initial regulatory analysis submitted to the office of
management and budget under section 22.8 of this chapter needs to be
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106


revised. If the impact of the readopted rule is substantially different
from the recalled rule, the agency shall submit the revised regulatory
analysis to the publisher for publication in the Indiana Register with the
document control number assigned by the publisher to the rule. The
agency also shall comply with any other applicable approval
requirement provided by statute.
(f) The readopted version of a recalled rule is effective only after the
agency has complied with section 35, 37.1, 37.2, or 38 of this chapter.
2026 IN 1294—LS 6920/DI 106